Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.060

Expiration of licenses.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, licenses issued under this chapter expire as follows:

(a) A body art, body piercing, or tattooing shop or business location license expires one year from issuance or when the insurance required by RCW 18.300.070(1)(g) expires, whichever occurs first; and

(b) Body art, body piercing, or tattooing practitioner individual licenses expire one year from issuance.

(2) The director may provide for expiration dates other than those set forth in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of establishing staggered renewal periods.

[ 2009 c 412 s 7.]